apertium-eng-kaz1/apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="r/ide__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ide</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ide</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ides</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ode</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>idden</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iding</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iding</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iding</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="t/ake__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ake</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ake</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>akes</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ook</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aken</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aking</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aking</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aking</l>
        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/ind__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ind</l>
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ind</l>
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inds</l>
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ound</l>
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ound</l>
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inding</l>
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inding</l>
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inding</l>
        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="b/ite__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ite</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ite</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ites</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>it</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>itten</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iting</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iting</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iting</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ble/ed__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eds</l>
        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>d</l>
        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>d</l>
        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eding</l>
        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eding</l>
        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eding</l>
        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bles/s__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ses</l>
        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>st</l>
        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>sed</l>
        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>st</l>
        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>sed</l>
        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>sing</l>
        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>sing</l>
        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>sing</l>
        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e lm="take part" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>part</l><r><g><b/>part</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="take place" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>place</l><r><g><b/>place</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="take advantage of" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>advantage<b/>of</l><r><g><b/>advantage<b/>of</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="take" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="undertake" i=""><i>undert</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="ride" i=""><i>r</i><par n="r/ide__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="take action" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>action</l><r><g><b/>action</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="take a step forward" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>step<b/>forward</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>step<b/>forward</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="take the air" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>the<b/>air</l><r><g><b/>the<b/>air</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="take down" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="take on" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="bite" i=""><i>b</i><par n="b/ite__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="bind" i=""><i>b</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="breed" i=""><i>bre</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="find out" i=""><i>f</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="find" i=""><i>f</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="feed" i=""><i>fe</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="shake" i=""><i>sh</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
                            <e r="LR" i=""><i>spe</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
                            <e r="LR" i=""><i>spe</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="take part" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>part</l><r><g><b/>part</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="take place" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>place</l><r><g><b/>place</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="take advantage of" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>advantage<b/>of</l><r><g><b/>advantage<b/>of</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="take" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="undertake" i=""><i>undert</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="ride" i=""><i>r</i><par n="r/ide__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="take responsibility" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>responsibility</l><r><g><b/>responsibility</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="take refuge" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>refuge</l><r><g><b/>refuge</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="take communion" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>communion</l><r><g><b/>communion</g></r></p></e>
